California, session 20252026, AB616.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5010.8 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5010.8. At the discretion of the department, and upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or another statute, the department may issue vehicle day use annual passes, free of charge, to the California State Library to support the California State Library Parks Pass Program.